Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5k. new text end new text begin Speed limit on Steele County State-Aid Highway 12 in the city of Medford. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, the speed limit on Steele County State-Aid Highway 12 is: new text end new text begin (1) 45 miles per hour between 6th Street Southeast in the city of Medford and Steele County State-Aid Highway 1; and new text end new text begin (2) 35 miles per hour between 5th Street Southeast and 6th Street Southeast in the city of Medford. new text end new text begin (b) The county engineer must erect appropriate signs displaying the speed limits specified in this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end